Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 10
MEDICATION FOR OPIOID USE DISORDER

Cross references:

For the short title ("Behavioral Health Recovery Act of 2021") and the legislative declaration in SB 21-137, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 362, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-21-1001. Medication for opioid use disorder - consultation - stipends - school of medicine duties - legislative declaration - repeal.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Many health-care providers who have completed the training required by the federal drug enforcement agency and are eligible to provide medication for opioid use disorder are not actively providing medication for opioid use disorder to patients who would benefit from this medical service; and

Practice consultation services consisting of follow-up training and support, including stipends, can increase the number of health-care providers who prescribe medication for opioid use disorder and the number of patients receiving medication for opioid use disorder.

The university of Colorado school of medicine shall:

Provide practice consultation services to health-care providers who are eligible to provide medication for opioid use disorder. Practice consultation services must include:

Staff training and workflow enhancement to encourage screening for opioid use disorder and educational materials for patients who screen positive for opioid use disorder;

Supporting the adoption of communication strategies that provide information to patients and referral sources, including but not limited to emergency departments, emergency medical service providers, hospitals, sheriffs departments, harm reduction organizations, and faith-based organizations; and

Providing access to marketing materials designed for patients and developed with patient and practitioner input.

Provide stipends to health-care providers who are eligible to provide medication for opioid use disorder and who have achieved certain benchmarks known to lead to an increased number of patients being managed by medication for opioid use disorder. At a minimum, the benchmarks must include:

Staff training and workflow enhancement to encourage screening and medication for opioid use disorder induction for patients who screen positive for opioid use disorder;

Adoption of marketing and communication strategies; and

Documentation of having provided medication for opioid use disorder to at least ten patients within a twelve-month period.

For the 2021-22 state fiscal year, the general assembly shall appropriate six hundred thirty thousand dollars from the behavioral and mental health cash fund created in section 24-75-230 to the board of regents of the university of Colorado for the implementation of this section. If any unexpended or unencumbered money remains at the end of the fiscal year, the board of regents of the university of Colorado may expend the money for the same purposes in the next fiscal year without further appropriation.

This subsection (3) is repealed, effective July 1, 2023.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire part added, (SB 21-137), ch. 362, p. 2383, § 31, effective June 28.

L. 2022:

(3)(a) amended, (SB 22-212), ch. 421, p. 2975, § 50, effective August 10.